Illinois, session 104th, HB4876.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 16-115 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/16-115)7    Sec. 16-115. Certification of alternative retail electric 8suppliers.9    (a) Any alternative retail electric supplier must obtain a 10certificate of service authority from the Commission in 11accordance with this Section before serving any retail 12customer or other user located in this State. An alternative 13retail electric supplier may request, and the Commission may 14grant, a certificate of service authority for the entire State 15or for a specified geographic area of the State. A certificate 16granted pursuant to this Section is not property, and the 17grant of a certificate to an entity does not create a property 18interest in the certificate. This Section does not diminish 19the existing rights of a certificate holder to notice and 20hearing as proscribed by the Illinois Administrative Procedure 21Act and in rules adopted by the Commission. 22    (b) An alternative retail electric supplier seeking a 23certificate of service authority shall file with the   HB4876- 2 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1Commission a verified application containing information 2showing that the applicant meets the requirements of this 3Section. The alternative retail electric supplier shall 4publish notice of its application in the official State 5newspaper within 14 10 days following the date of its filing. 6No later than 60 45 days after a complete application is 7properly filed with the Commission, and such notice is 8published, the Commission shall issue its order granting or 9denying the application.10    (c) An application for a certificate of service authority 11shall identify the area or areas in which the applicant 12intends to offer service and the types of services it intends 13to offer. Applicants that seek to serve residential or small 14commercial retail customers within a geographic area that is 15smaller than an electric utility's service area shall submit 16evidence demonstrating that the designation of this smaller 17area does not violate Section 16-115A. An applicant that seeks 18to serve residential or small commercial retail customers may 19state in its application for certification any limitations 20that will be imposed on the number of customers or maximum load 21to be served.22    (d) The Commission shall grant the application for a 23certificate of service authority if it makes the findings set 24forth in this subsection based on the verified application and 25such other information as the applicant may submit:26        (1) That the applicant possesses sufficient technical,   HB4876- 3 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1    financial, and managerial resources and abilities to 2    provide the service for which it seeks a certificate of 3    service authority. In determining the level of technical, 4    financial, and managerial resources and abilities which 5    the applicant must demonstrate, the Commission shall 6    consider (i) the characteristics, including the size and 7    financial sophistication, of the customers that the 8    applicant seeks to serve, and (ii) whether the applicant 9    seeks to provide electric power and energy using property, 10    plant, and equipment which it owns, controls, or operates, 11    and (iii) the applicant's commitment of resources to the 12    management of its sales and marketing staff through 13    affirmative managerial policies, independent audits, 14    technology, hands-on field monitoring, and training and, 15    for applicants who have sales personnel or sales agents 16    within this State, the applicant's managerial presence 17    within this State;18        (2) That the applicant will comply with all applicable 19    federal, State, regional, and industry rules, policies, 20    practices, and procedures, and tariffs for the use, 21    operation, and maintenance of the safety, integrity, and 22    reliability, of the interconnected electric transmission 23    system;24        (3) That the applicant will only provide service to 25    retail customers in an electric utility's service area 26    that are eligible to take delivery services under this   HB4876- 4 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1    Act;2        (4) That the applicant will comply with such 3    informational or reporting requirements as the Commission 4    may by rule establish and provide the information required 5    by Section 16-112. Any data related to contracts for the 6    purchase and sale of electric power and energy shall be 7    made available for review by the Staff of the Commission 8    on a confidential and proprietary basis and only to the 9    extent and for the purposes which the Commission 10    determines are reasonably necessary in order to carry out 11    the purposes of this Act;12        (5) That the applicant will procure renewable energy 13    resources in accordance with Section 16-115D of this Act, 14    and will source electricity from clean coal facilities, as 15    defined in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, 16    in amounts at least equal to the percentages set forth in 17    subsections (c) and (d) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois 18    Power Agency Act. For purposes of this Section: 19            (i) (blank);20            (ii) (blank);21            (iii) the required sourcing of electricity 22        generated by clean coal facilities, other than the 23        initial clean coal facility, shall be limited to the 24        amount of electricity that can be procured or sourced 25        at a price at or below the benchmarks approved by the 26        Commission each year in accordance with item (1) of   HB4876- 5 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1        subsection (c) and items (1) and (5) of subsection (d) 2        of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act;3            (iv) all alternative retail electric suppliers 4        shall execute a sourcing agreement to source 5        electricity from the initial clean coal facility, on 6        the terms set forth in paragraphs (3) and (4) of 7        subsection (d) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 8        Agency Act, except that in lieu of the requirements in 9        subparagraphs (A)(v), (B)(i), (C)(v), and (C)(vi) of 10        paragraph (3) of that subsection (d), the applicant 11        shall execute one or more of the following:12                (1) if the sourcing agreement is a power 13            purchase agreement, a contract with the initial 14            clean coal facility to purchase in each hour an 15            amount of electricity equal to all clean coal 16            energy made available from the initial clean coal 17            facility during such hour, which the utilities are 18            not required to procure under the terms of 19            subsection (d) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois 20            Power Agency Act, multiplied by a fraction, the 21            numerator of which is the alternative retail 22            electric supplier's retail market sales of 23            electricity (expressed in kilowatthours sold) in 24            the State during the prior calendar month and the 25            denominator of which is the total sales of 26            electricity (expressed in kilowatthours sold) in   HB4876- 6 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1            the State by alternative retail electric suppliers 2            during such prior month that are subject to the 3            requirements of this paragraph (5) of subsection 4            (d) of this Section and subsection (d) of Section 5            1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act plus the 6            total sales of electricity (expressed in 7            kilowatthours sold) by utilities outside of their 8            service areas during such prior month, pursuant to 9            subsection (c) of Section 16-116 of this Act; or10                (2) if the sourcing agreement is a contract 11            for differences, a contract with the initial clean 12            coal facility in each hour with respect to an 13            amount of electricity equal to all clean coal 14            energy made available from the initial clean coal 15            facility during such hour, which the utilities are 16            not required to procure under the terms of 17            subsection (d) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois 18            Power Agency Act, multiplied by a fraction, the 19            numerator of which is the alternative retail 20            electric supplier's retail market sales of 21            electricity (expressed in kilowatthours sold) in 22            the State during the prior calendar month and the 23            denominator of which is the total sales of 24            electricity (expressed in kilowatthours sold) in 25            the State by alternative retail electric suppliers 26            during such prior month that are subject to the   HB4876- 7 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1            requirements of this paragraph (5) of subsection 2            (d) of this Section and subsection (d) of Section 3            1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act plus the 4            total sales of electricity (expressed in 5            kilowatthours sold) by utilities outside of their 6            service areas during such prior month, pursuant to 7            subsection (c) of Section 16-116 of this Act; 8            (v) if, in any year after the first year of 9        commercial operation, the owner of the clean coal 10        facility fails to demonstrate to the Commission that 11        the initial clean coal facility captured and 12        sequestered at least 50% of the total carbon emissions 13        that the facility would otherwise emit or that 14        sequestration of emissions from prior years has 15        failed, resulting in the release of carbon into the 16        atmosphere, the owner of the facility must offset 17        excess emissions. Any such carbon offsets must be 18        permanent, additional, verifiable, real, located 19        within the State of Illinois, and legally and 20        practicably enforceable. The costs of any such offsets 21        that are not recoverable shall not exceed $15,000,000 22        in any given year. No costs of any such purchases of 23        carbon offsets may be recovered from an alternative 24        retail electric supplier or its customers. All carbon 25        offsets purchased for this purpose and any carbon 26        emission credits associated with sequestration of   HB4876- 8 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1        carbon from the facility must be permanently retired. 2        The initial clean coal facility shall not forfeit its 3        designation as a clean coal facility if the facility 4        fails to fully comply with the applicable carbon 5        sequestration requirements in any given year, provided 6        the requisite offsets are purchased. However, the 7        Attorney General, on behalf of the People of the State 8        of Illinois, may specifically enforce the facility's 9        sequestration requirement and the other terms of this 10        contract provision. Compliance with the sequestration 11        requirements and offset purchase requirements that 12        apply to the initial clean coal facility shall be 13        reviewed annually by an independent expert retained by 14        the owner of the initial clean coal facility, with the 15        advance written approval of the Attorney General;16            (vi) The Commission shall, after notice and 17        hearing, revoke the certification of any alternative 18        retail electric supplier that fails to execute a 19        sourcing agreement with the initial clean coal 20        facility as required by item (5) of subsection (d) of 21        this Section. The sourcing agreements with this 22        initial clean coal facility shall be subject to both 23        approval of the initial clean coal facility by the 24        General Assembly and satisfaction of the requirements 25        of item (4) of subsection (d) of Section 1-75 of the 26        Illinois Power Agency Act, and shall be executed   HB4876- 9 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1        within 90 days after any such approval by the General 2        Assembly. The Commission shall not accept an 3        application for certification from an alternative 4        retail electric supplier that has lost certification 5        under this subsection (d), or any corporate affiliate 6        thereof, for at least one year from the date of 7        revocation; 8        (6) With respect to an applicant that seeks to serve 9    residential or small commercial retail customers, that the 10    area to be served by the applicant and any limitations it 11    proposes on the number of customers or maximum amount of 12    load to be served meet the provisions of Section 16-115A, 13    provided, that the Commission can extend the time for 14    considering such a certificate request by up to 90 days, 15    and can schedule hearings on such a request;16        (7) That the applicant meets the requirements of 17    subsection (a) of Section 16-128;18        (8) That the applicant discloses whether the applicant 19    is the subject of any lawsuit filed in a court of law or 20    formal complaint filed with a regulatory agency alleging 21    fraud, deception, or unfair marketing practices or other 22    similar allegations and, if the applicant is the subject 23    of such lawsuit or formal complaint, the applicant shall 24    identify the name, case number, and jurisdiction of each 25    lawsuit or complaint, and that the applicant is capable of 26    fulfilling its obligations as an alternative retail   HB4876- 10 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1    electric supplier in Illinois notwithstanding any lawsuit 2    or complaint. For the purpose of this item (8), "formal 3    complaint" includes only those complaints that seek a 4    binding determination from a State or federal regulatory 5    body;6        (9) That the applicant shall at all times remain in 7    compliance with requirements for certification stated in 8    this Section and as the Commission may establish by rule;9        (10) That the applicant shall execute and maintain a 10    license or permit bond issued by a qualifying surety or 11    insurance company authorized to transact business in the 12    State of Illinois in favor of the People of the State of 13    Illinois. The amount of the bond shall equal $30,000 if 14    the applicant seeks to serve only nonresidential retail 15    customers with maximum electrical demands of one megawatt 16    or more, $150,000 if the applicant seeks to serve only 17    nonresidential retail customers with annual electrical 18    consumption greater than 15,000 kilowatt-hours, or 19    $500,000 if the applicant seeks to serve all eligible 20    customers. Applicants shall be required to submit an 21    additional $500,000 bond if the applicant intends to 22    market to residential customers using in-person 23    solicitations. The bonds shall be conditioned upon the 24    full and faithful performance of all duties and 25    obligations of the applicant as an alternative retail 26    electric supplier, shall be valid for a period of not less   HB4876- 11 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1    than one year, and may be drawn upon in whole or in part to 2    satisfy any penalties imposed, and finally adjudicated, by 3    the Commission pursuant to Section 16-115B for a violation 4    of the applicant's duties or obligations, except that the 5    total amount of claims and penalties against the bond 6    shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond and shall not 7    include any consequential or punitive damage. The cost of 8    the bond shall be paid by the applicant. The applicant 9    shall file a copy of this bond, with a notarized 10    verification page from the issuer, as part of its 11    application for certification under 83 Ill. Adm. Code 451; 12    and13        (11) That the applicant will comply with all other 14    applicable laws and regulations.15    (d-3) The Commission may deny with prejudice an 16application in which the applicant fails to provide the 17Commission with information sufficient for the Commission to 18grant the application. 19    (d-5) (Blank). 20    (e) A retail customer that owns a cogeneration or 21self-generation facility and that seeks certification only to 22provide electric power and energy from such facility to retail 23customers at separate locations which customers are both (i) 24owned by, or a subsidiary or other corporate affiliate of, 25such applicant and (ii) eligible for delivery services, shall 26be granted a certificate of service authority upon filing an   HB4876- 12 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1application and notifying the Commission that it has entered 2into an agreement with the relevant electric utilities 3pursuant to Section 16-118. Provided, however, that if the 4retail customer owning such cogeneration or self-generation 5facility would not be charged a transition charge due to the 6exemption provided under subsection (f) of Section 16-108 7prior to the certification, and the retail customers at 8separate locations are taking delivery services in conjunction 9with purchasing power and energy from the facility, the retail 10customer on whose premises the facility is located shall not 11thereafter be required to pay transition charges on the power 12and energy that such retail customer takes from the facility.13    (f) The Commission shall have the authority to promulgate 14rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this 15Section. On or before May 1, 1999, the Commission shall adopt a 16rule or rules applicable to the certification of those 17alternative retail electric suppliers that seek to serve only 18nonresidential retail customers with maximum electrical 19demands of one megawatt or more which shall provide for (i) 20expedited and streamlined procedures for certification of such 21alternative retail electric suppliers and (ii) specific 22criteria which, if met by any such alternative retail electric 23supplier, shall constitute the demonstration of technical, 24financial and managerial resources and abilities to provide 25service required by paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this 26Section, such as a requirement to post a bond or letter of   HB4876- 13 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1credit, from a responsible surety or financial institution, of 2sufficient size for the nature and scope of the services to be 3provided; demonstration of adequate insurance for the scope 4and nature of the services to be provided; and experience in 5providing similar services in other jurisdictions.6    (g) An alternative retail electric supplier may seek 7confidential treatment for the following information by filing 8an affidavit with the Commission so long as the affidavit 9meets the requirements in this subsection (g):10        (1) the total annual kilowatt-hours delivered and sold 11    by an alternative retail electric supplier to retail 12    customers within each utility service territory and the 13    total annual kilowatt-hours delivered and sold by an 14    alternative retail electric supplier to retail customers 15    in all utility service territories in the preceding 16    calendar year as required by 83 Ill. Adm. Code 451.770;17        (2) the total peak demand supplied by an alternative 18    retail electric supplier during the previous year in each 19    utility service territory as required by 83 Ill. Adm. Code 20    465.40;21        (3) a good faith estimate of the amount an alternative 22    retail electric supplier expects to be obliged to pay the 23    utility under single billing tariffs during the next 12 24    months and the amount of any bond or letter of credit used 25    to demonstrate an alternative retail electric supplier's 26    credit worthiness to provide single billing services   HB4876- 14 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1    pursuant to 83 Ill. Adm. Code 451.510(a) and (b).2    The affidavit must be filed contemporaneously with the 3information for which confidential treatment is sought and 4must clearly state that the affiant seeks confidential 5treatment pursuant to this subsection (g) and the information 6for which confidential treatment is sought must be clearly 7identified on the confidential version of the document filed 8with the Commission. The affidavit must be accompanied by a 9"confidential" and a "public" version of the document or 10documents containing the information for which confidential 11treatment is sought.12    If the alternative retail electric supplier has met the 13affidavit requirements of this subsection (g), then the 14Commission shall afford confidential treatment to the 15information identified in the affidavit for a period of 2 16years after the date the affidavit is received by the 17Commission.18    Nothing in this subsection (g) prevents an alternative 19retail electric supplier from filing a petition with the 20Commission seeking confidential treatment for information 21beyond that identified in this subsection (g) or for 22information contained in other reports or documents filed with 23the Commission other than annual rate reports.24    Nothing in this subsection (g) prevents the Commission, on 25its own motion, or any party from filing a formal petition with 26the Commission seeking to reconsider the conferring of   HB4876- 15 -LRB104 19124 AAS 32569 b1confidential status on an item of information afforded 2confidential treatment pursuant to this subsection (g).3    The Commission, on its own motion, may at any time 4initiate a docketed proceeding to investigate the continued 5applicability of this subsection (g) to the information 6contained in items (i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection 7(g). If, at the end of such investigation, the Commission 8determines that a particular item of information should no 9longer be eligible for the affidavit-based process outlined in 10this subsection (g), the Commission may enter an order to 11remove that item from the list of items eligible for the 12process set forth in this subsection (g). Notwithstanding any 13such order, in the event the Commission makes such a 14determination, nothing in this subsection (g) prevents an 15alternative retail electric supplier desiring confidential 16treatment for such information from filing a formal petition 17with the Commission seeking confidential treatment for such 18information.19(Source: P.A. 101-590, eff. 1-1-20; 102-958, eff. 1-1-23.)